Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 1. Declaration of Policy.

Sec. 46.03.010.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state to conserve, improve, and protect its natural resources and environment and control water, land, and air pollution, in order to enhance the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state and their overall economic and social well-being.

It is the policy of the state to improve and coordinate the environmental plans, functions, powers, and programs of the state, in cooperation with the federal government, regions, local governments, other public and private organizations, and concerned individuals, and to develop and manage the basic resources of water, land, and air to the end that the state may fulfill its responsibility as trustee of the environment for the present and future generations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For land application of biosolids, see 18 AAC 60, art. 5.

For reserved, see 18 AAC 60, art. 6.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For nondomestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 6.

For purpose, applicability, and term, see 18 AAC 83, art. 1.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

For permit application requirements, see 18 AAC 83, art. 4.

For permit conditions — general, see 18 AAC 83, art. 5.

For requirements and permit conditions specific to type of discharge, see 18 AAC 83, art. 6.

For purpose, applicability, prohibitions, and discharge notification, see 18 AAC 90, art. 1.

For pesticide registration, see 18 AAC 90, art. 2.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 3.

For recordkeeping requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 4.

For permit requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 5.

For pesticide handling requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 6.

For inspection and enforcement, see 18 AAC 90, art. 7.

For forestry vegetation management, see 18 AAC 90, art. 8.